Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299P.01] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Animal. new text end new text begin "Animal" has the meaning given in section 343.20, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Animal cruelty. new text end new text begin "Animal cruelty" has the meaning given to cruelty in section 343.20, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Director. new text end new text begin "Director" means the director of the Office of Animal Protection. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Office. new text end new text begin "Office" means the Office of Animal Protection. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [299P.02] OFFICE OF ANIMAL PROTECTION; CREATION; POWERS AND DUTIES; ANNUAL REPORTING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Creation. new text end new text begin The Office of Animal Protection is created within the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension of the Department of Public Safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Function of the office. new text end new text begin Animal cruelty is an ongoing occurrence throughout Minnesota and is also linked to human violence and criminal activity. The Office of Animal Protection is responsible for addressing animal cruelty in a more comprehensive and centralized manner in order to protect the public's health and safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Powers and duties. new text end new text begin The office has the following powers and duties: new text end new text begin (1) promote a comprehensive and measurable approach for the prevention of animal cruelty, protection of animals, enforcement of animal cruelty statutes, and education across multiple disciplines throughout the state, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) investigations; new text end new text begin (ii) prosecution; new text end new text begin (iii) forensic veterinary medicine; new text end new text begin (iv) animal care, transport, and housing; and new text end new text begin (v) human welfare, as it relates to offenders or victims of animal cruelty; new text end new text begin (2) foster partnerships and collaborations with other criminal justice partners and related disciplines, as described in clause (1), items (i) to (v), to identify community and enforcement needs and challenges related to the crime of animal cruelty; establish effective enforcement practices and initiatives based on these needs; and, if needed, seek changes to laws or administrative rules; new text end new text begin (3) build capacity to assist local, state, Tribal, and federal authorities and other criminal justice partners in the investigation and prosecution of animal cruelty, including providing information, education, advice, services, and resources and engaging communities in the prevention of animal cruelty; new text end new text begin (4) provide standards, training, and certification for authorities and criminal justice partners in the enforcement of animal cruelty laws; new text end new text begin (5) educate, train, and build public awareness of the importance of the humane treatment of animals with the goals of demonstrating why animal cruelty is harmful to society, including the link to human violence, and increasing knowledge about how to recognize and report suspected animal cruelty; new text end new text begin (6) support the advisory committee established in section 299P.03 and coordinate the office's mission with the committee's guidance; new text end new text begin (7) conduct case reviews involving the investigation, prosecution, and sentencing of selected closed animal cruelty cases and provide feedback to the entities involved; new text end new text begin (8) collect, maintain, analyze, and report on data relating to animal cruelty cases; new text end new text begin (9) conduct and compile research into animal cruelty and publicize the results of the research; and new text end new text begin (10) award grants as provided in section 299P.06. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Annual performance report. new text end new text begin On or before January 15 of each year, the director shall submit an annual report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over public safety finance and policy on the office's operations and any recommendations for changes in law relating to animal protection. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [299P.03] ADVISORY COMMITTEE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Advisory committee. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall establish and appoint the members of an advisory committee pursuant to section 15.059. The committee shall adopt procedures to govern the committee's conduct as necessary and select a chair from among its members. The committee shall act in an advisory capacity, providing assistance and advice to the office in the development and execution of its duties, including outreach to communities and stakeholders. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Committee members. new text end new text begin Committee members shall possess knowledge, skills, or experiences in the prevention, investigation, or prosecution of animal cruelty and the care of animals, reflecting the five disciplines described in section 299P.02, subdivision 3, clause (1), items (i) to (v). The committee shall also include members of the public with knowledge of animal law and animal cruelty or experiences with animal cruelty as a victim, including trauma of victims. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Subcommittees. new text end new text begin The committee may establish subcommittees to identify, discuss, and make recommendations on specific topics related to animal cruelty and effective enforcement efforts of animal cruelty statutes, including but not limited to animal cruelty reporting, victim services, crime data collection, cross-reporting, courtroom advocates, and crime prevention. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [299P.04] DIRECTOR; OTHER STAFF. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall appoint a director for the office. The director shall have qualifications that include or are similar to the following: new text end new text begin (1) experience or knowledge in criminal law; new text end new text begin (2) experience or knowledge in the many facets of animal cruelty and the five disciplines described in section 299P.02, subdivision 3, clause (1), items (i) to (v), that contribute to the protection of animals and humans and successful outcomes; and new text end new text begin (3) expertise in leadership with planning and communication skills to foster change management techniques and define, develop, and implement office priorities, policies, and operations. new text end new text begin (b) The director may hire additional staff to assist in performing the duties of the office. Office staff shall be in the classified service of the state and their compensation shall be established pursuant to chapter 43A. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [299P.05] AGREEMENTS AND CONTRACTS; LOCAL AUTHORITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Agreements and contracts. new text end new text begin The director may enter into contracts with parties to assist with fulfilling the office's powers and duties under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authority of local governing bodies. new text end new text begin This chapter shall not be construed to limit or preempt additional requirements imposed on or possessed by any city, town, or county. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [299P.06] ANIMAL PROTECTION ACCOUNT; GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Money received from other sources. new text end new text begin The director may accept money received as gifts, grants, or contributions from any source to support the purposes of the office under this chapter. The director may apply for and accept grants of money from the federal government, the state, any foundation, or any person to support the purposes of the office. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Animal protection account. new text end new text begin An animal protection account is created in the special revenue fund. All money received under subdivision 1 shall be deposited into the account. Money in the account, including interest, is annually appropriated to the commissioner to administer this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grants authorized. new text end new text begin The commissioner may use money in the animal protection account to make grants to state and local units of government and nonprofit organizations to promote animal protection efforts as described in this chapter. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.712, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Crime of violence. "Crime of violence" means: felony convictions of the following offenses: sections 609.185 (murder in the first degree); 609.19 (murder in the second degree); 609.195 (murder in the third degree); 609.20 (manslaughter in the first degree); 609.205 (manslaughter in the second degree); 609.215 (aiding suicide and aiding attempted suicide); 609.221 (assault in the first degree); 609.222 (assault in the second degree); 609.223 (assault in the third degree); 609.2231 (assault in the fourth degree); 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); 609.2242 (domestic assault); 609.2247 (domestic assault by strangulation); 609.229 (crimes committed for the benefit of a gang); 609.235 (use of drugs to injure or facilitate crime); 609.24 (simple robbery); 609.245 (aggravated robbery); 609.247 (carjacking); 609.25 (kidnapping); 609.255 (false imprisonment); 609.322 (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking); 609.342 (criminal sexual conduct in the first degree); 609.343 (criminal sexual conduct in the second degree); 609.344 (criminal sexual conduct in the third degree); 609.345 (criminal sexual conduct in the fourth degree); 609.377 (malicious punishment of a child); 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.486 (commission of crime while wearing or possessing a bullet-resistant vest); 609.52 (involving theft of a firearm and theft involving the theft of a controlled substance, an explosive, or an incendiary device); 609.561 (arson in the first degree); 609.562 (arson in the second degree); 609.582, subdivision 1 or 2 (burglary in the first and second degrees); 609.66, subdivision 1e (drive-by shooting); 609.67 (unlawfully owning, possessing, operating a machine gun or short-barreled shotgun); 609.71 (riot); 609.713 (terroristic threats); 609.749 (harassment); 609.855, subdivision 5 (shooting at a public transit vehicle or facility); deleted text begin and chapterdeleted text end new text begin chaptersnew text end 152 (drugs, controlled substances); new text begin and 343 (prevention of cruelty to animals); new text end and an attempt to commit any of these offenses. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin OFFICE OF ANIMAL PROTECTION; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to establish and operate the Office of Animal Protection established under this act. new text end